Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1088
Salon license; revoked or expired; effect.

The license of a salon that has been revoked or expired for any reason shall not be reinstated. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such salon may reopen for business.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 87;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,126;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 350.